Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-2808
Levy authorized; allocations.

A municipal county may levy up to one dollar per one hundred dollars of taxable value, not including bonded indebtedness. From the levy authority of the municipal county, the municipal county may allocate to miscellaneous political subdivisions as provided in section 77-3443. In no event shall the levies of the municipal county and any miscellaneous political subdivisions allocated levy authority by the municipal county total more than one dollar per one hundred dollars of taxable value on any one parcel in the municipal county, except for bonded indebtedness approved according to law, lease-purchase agreements approved prior to July 1, 1998, and judgments obtained against the municipal county or one of its predecessors which obligate the municipal county to pay the judgments to the extent not paid by liability insurance and except as provided in section 77-3444.

Laws 2001, LB 142, § 8.